apertium-es-ca.ca.dix
    <pardef n="atr/eure__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>auríem</l> 
        <r>eure<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>auria</l> 
        <r>eure<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>auríeu</l> 
        <r>eure<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>auries</l> 
        <r>eure<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aurien</l> 
        <r>eure<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>auria</l> 
        <r>eure<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aurem</l> 
        <r>eure<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>auré</l> 
        <r>eure<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aureu</l> 
        <r>eure<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>auràs</l> 
        <r>eure<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>auran</l> 
        <r>eure<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aurà</l> 
        <r>eure<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>aguéssim</l> 
        <r>eure<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>agués</l> 
        <r>eure<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>aguéssiu</l> 
        <r>eure<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>aguessis</l> 
        <r>eure<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>aguessin</l> 
        <r>eure<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>agués</l> 
        <r>eure<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aient</l> 
        <r>eure<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aient</l> 
        <r>eure<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__anant"/> 
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>aguérem</l> 
        <r>eure<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>aguí</l> 
        <r>eure<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>aguéreu</l> 
        <r>eure<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>agueres</l> 
        <r>eure<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>agueren</l> 
        <r>eure<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>agué</l> 
        <r>eure<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aguem</l> 
        <r>eure<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aguem</l> 
        <r>eure<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__aneu"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aieu</l> 
        <r>eure<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aieu</l> 
        <r>eure<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__aneu"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eu</l> 
        <r>eure<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>au</l> 
        <r>eure<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eu</l> 
        <r>eure<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__aclareix"/> 
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>au</l> 
        <r>eure<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__aclareix"/> 
    </e>

    <e v="cat">
      <p>
        <l>eguin</l> 
        <r>eure<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="val">
      <p>
        <l>aguen</l> 
        <r>eure<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="cat">
      <p>
        <l>eguin</l> 
        <r>eure<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__anant"/> 
    </e>

    <e v="val">
      <p>
        <l>aguen</l> 
        <r>eure<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__anant"/> 
    </e>

    <e v="cat">
      <p>
        <l>egui</l> 
        <r>eure<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="val">
      <p>
        <l>aga</l> 
        <r>eure<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="cat">
      <p>
        <l>egui</l> 
        <r>eure<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__vagi"/> 
    </e>

    <e v="val">
      <p>
        <l>aga</l> 
        <r>eure<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__vagi"/> 
    </e>

    <e v="cat">
      <p>
        <l>eure</l> 
        <r>eure<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="val">
      <p>
        <l>aure</l> 
        <r>eure<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="cat">
      <p>
        <l>eure</l> 
        <r>eure<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__vagi"/> 
    </e>

    <e v="val">
      <p>
        <l>aure</l> 
        <r>eure<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__vagi"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>èiem</l> 
        <r>eure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>éiem</l> 
        <r>eure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eia</l> 
        <r>eure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>èieu</l> 
        <r>eure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>éieu</l> 
        <r>eure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eies</l> 
        <r>eure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eien</l> 
        <r>eure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eia</l> 
        <r>eure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="cat">
      <p>
        <l>aguéssim</l> 
        <r>eure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="val">
      <p>
        <l>aguérem</l> 
        <r>eure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="cat">
      <p>
        <l>agués</l> 
        <r>eure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e v="val">
      <p>
        <l>aguera</l> 

<e lm="atreure"><i>atr</i><par n="atr/eure__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="contreure"><i>contr</i><par n="atr/eure__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="distreure"><i>distr</i><par n="atr/eure__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="extreure"><i>extr</i><par n="atr/eure__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="retreure"><i>retr</i><par n="atr/eure__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sostreure"><i>sostr</i><par n="atr/eure__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="treure"><i>tr</i><par n="atr/eure__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="abstreure" a="prompsit2adn"><i>abstr</i><par n="atr/eure__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bestreure" a="prompsit"><i>bestr</i><par n="atr/eure__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="treure de polleguera"><i>tr</i><par n="atr/eure__vblex"/><p><l><b/>de<b/>polleguera</l><r><g><b/>de<b/>polleguera</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="treure profit" r="RL"><i>tr</i><par n="atr/eure__vblex"/><p><l><b/>profit</l><r><g><b/>profit</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="treure els draps al sol"><i>tr</i><par n="atr/eure__vblex"/><p><l><b/>els<b/>draps<b/>al<b/>sol</l><r><g><b/>els<b/>draps<b/>al<b/>sol</g></r></p></e>
